Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-2808
Representative, defined.

Representative shall mean the spouse, parent, guardian, adult child, executor, administrator, trustee, attorney, or other legal agent of the patient.

Laws 1976, LB 434, § 8.